Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5707
Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund; created; use; investment.

The Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Economic Development and shall be used for the purposes of the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund shall consist of money transferred by the Legislature and money that was recouped under the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 129.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.